Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,310
Moped; operation;
license required.

No person shall operate a moped upon a
highway unless such person has a valid operator's license.

Laws
1979, LB 23, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,197;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 406;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 27.